test/src/morphology/N-umaarz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - umārz: # Noun 226 'eng /est õun/fin' - full paradigm
     umārz+N+Sg+Nom: umārz
     umārz+N+Sg+Gen: umār
     umārz+N+Sg+Par: umārt
     umārz+N+Sg+Dat: umārõn
     umārz+N+Sg+Ins: umārõks
     umārz+N+Sg+Ill: umārõ
     umārz+N+Sg+Ela: umārõst
     umārz+N+Pl+Nom: umārd
     umārz+N+Pl+Gen: umārd
     umārz+N+Pl+Par: umāŗi
     umārz+N+Pl+Dat: umārdõn
     umārz+N+Pl+Ins: umārdõks
     umārz+N+Pl+Ill: umāŗiž
     umārz+N+Pl+Ela: umāŗist
